Utah statutes.
72-6-104.   Highways to conform to grade and direction in municipalities.
Except for the highways part of the interstate system, a highway that extends
through a municipality shall conform to the direction and grade of other
streets in the municipality unless permission is obtained from the highway
authorities of the municipality for a variance in the direction and grade.
